Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2845
Supervision, defined.

Supervision means the personal guidance and direction by a pharmacist of the performance by a pharmacy technician of authorized activities or functions subject to (1) verification by such pharmacist or (2) validation by a certified pharmacy technician subject to section 38-2891.01. Supervision of a pharmacy technician may occur by means of a real-time audiovisual communication system.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 941;

Laws 2013, LB326, § 1;

Laws 2019, LB74, § 3.